District of Columbia statutes.
45-604

“Person” to include partnerships and corporations.

The word “person” shall be held to apply to partnerships and corporations, unless such construction would be unreasonable, and the reference to any officer shall include any person authorized by law to perform the duties of his office, unless the context shows that such words were intended to be used in a more limited sense.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1189, ch. 854
Acts and resolutions of Council, rules of construction, see § 1-301.45 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 49-204.
1973 Ed., § 49-204.